Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2011
76-3304
Pipeline carrier; responsible for
reclamation costs; commencement of reclamation; period of obligation.

(1) A pipeline
carrier owning, operating, or managing a pipeline or part of a pipeline for
the transportation of oil in this state shall be responsible for all reclamation
costs necessary as a result of constructing the pipeline as well as reclamation
costs resulting from operating the pipeline, except to the extent another
party is determined to be responsible.

(2) The pipeline
carrier shall commence reclamation of the area through which a pipeline is
constructed as soon as reasonably practicable after backfill.

(3) A pipeline
carrier's obligation for reclamation and maintenance of the pipeline right-of-way
shall continue until the pipeline is permanently decommissioned or removed.

Laws 2011, LB629, § 4.
May 27, 2011